Maryland, session 2025, SB0544.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
21–325.
(a) [Each] SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (D) OF THIS SECTION, EACH food
establishment shall have:
(1) A convenient toilet that is:
(i) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, separated
from any room in which food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or
distributed;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated; and
(2) A convenient lavatory that is:
(i) Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand drying
devices;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated.
– 1 –

Ch. 761 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Each food service facility which prepares food and provides seating for patrons
established after January 1, 1979, shall have available for the public:
(1) A convenient toilet that is kept in a sanitary condition; and
(2) A convenient lavatory that is:
(i) Supplied with soap, water, towels, or other approved hand drying
devices;
(ii) Kept in a sanitary condition; and
(iii) Properly ventilated.
(c) A room that houses a toilet may be constructed within a larger room in which
food is manufactured, prepared, packed, canned, frozen, sold, or distributed.
(D) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO A FOOD ESTABLISHMENT
THAT IS:
(I) A BUSINESS THAT CONDUCTS AGRITOURISM, AS DEFINED IN
§ 4–212 OF THE LAND USE ARTICLE;
(II) A CLASS 4 LIMITED WINERY LICENSED UNDER § 2–206 OF
THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE; AND
(III) A CLASS 8 FARM BREWERY LICENSED UNDER § 2–210 OF
THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS ARTICLE.
(2) A FOOD ESTABLISHMENT MAY COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENT
TO PROVIDE A CONVENIENT LAVATORY BY PROVIDING A PORTABLE CHEMICAL
TOILET THAT OTHERWISE:
(I) OTHERWISE MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION
(A)(2) OR (B)(2) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(II) IS PLACED AT LEAST 25 FEET FROM A WELL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 2 –